Wyoming, session 2025, HB0061.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 36-5-105(c)(intro) is amended to
read:
36-5-105. Criteria for leasing; preferences;
assignments, subleases or contracts; lands taken for war
purposes; mineral lands excepted; agricultural lands.
(c) An applicant who is the holder of an expiring
lease, and has paid the rental when due, and has is not
violated currently in violation of the provisions of the
lease, and is qualified under the provisions of W.S.
36-5-101, shall have a preferred right to renew such lease
by meeting the highest bid offered by another qualified
applicant whose bid is not less than the minimum fair
market value as determined by the board for the same or a
similar use of land using the formula developed pursuant to
W.S. 36-5-101(b) and not more than one hundred twenty
percent (120%) of the maximum fair market value as
determined by the board based on the previous year's values
for the state, district or county, whichever is most
localized and available, as determined by the national
agricultural statistics service utilizing:
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0061
ENROLLED ACT NO. 8, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2